Louisiana, session 2026, HB1144.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:708 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§708. Emergency contact signage
A. The secretary shall require every operator of a hazardous liquid pipeline
to include contact information on all required signage and line markers. The contact
information shall include a telephone number where the operator can be reached at
all times.
B. Operators shall certify with the secretary at least every twelve months that
the contact information included on all of the operator's signs and line markers
statewide is up to date and that the telephone number provided is active and will be
answered at all times. This certification shall be submitted by certified mail
addressed to the secretary.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2740 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1144
C. In addition to any damages found to be attributable to a violation of this
Section, failure to maintain signs and line markers in compliance with this Section
shall subject the operator to the penalties provided for in R.S. 30:705.
D. The provisions of this Section shall not be subject to the waiver provided
for pursuant to R.S. 30:704.